Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-840
Director; studies and report.

(1) The director shall make a continuous study of the State Lottery Act to ascertain any defects in the act or in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the act which could result in abuses in the administration and operation of lottery games or the act or in any evasion of such act or rules and regulations and shall report his or her findings to the Tax Commissioner for the purpose of making recommendations for improvement in the act.

(2) The director shall make a continuous study of the operation and the administration of similar laws which may be in effect in other states, any written materials on the subject which are published or available, any federal laws which may affect the operation of the state lottery, and the reaction of citizens to existing and potential features of the state lottery in order to recommend changes which will serve the purposes of the act.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 40;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 59.